Hawaii, session 2026, HB2457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that with the increasing likelihood and severity of natural disasters caused by climate change, the need for emergency preparedness to protect lives and property has become more urgent.  The legislature further finds that community resilience hubs could help residents prepare for natural or human-caused disasters. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to establish a pilot program within the Hawaii emergency management agency to create community resilience hubs throughout the State. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established within the Hawaii emergency management agency the community resilience hubs pilot program. (b)  The community resilience hubs pilot program shall establish five community resilience hubs throughout the State, as follows: (1)  One community resilience hub shall be located in an urban area of Oahu; (2)  One community resilience hub shall be located in a rural area of Oahu; (3)  One community resilience hub shall be located on the island of Hawaii; (4)  One community resilience hub shall be located on the island of Kauai; and (5)  One community resilience hub shall be located in Maui county. (c)  The Hawaii emergency management agency shall partner with any agency or subject matter groups that are equipped to assist communities with the planning, design, and execution of establishing their own community readiness centers or community resilience hubs. (d)  No later than twenty days before the convening of the regular session of 2027, the Hawaii emergency management agency shall submit to the legislature a report concerning the community resilience hubs pilot program, including any findings, recommendations, and proposed legislation. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the community resilience hubs pilot program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii emergency management agency for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.